Maine, session 132, LD1859.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 1083 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 1083
EARLY CHILDHOOD LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT RESOURCE HUBS
§4100-D. Regional early childhood learning and development resource hubs
1. Regional early childhood learning and development resource hubs established.
The department shall establish early childhood learning and development resource hubs,
referred to in this section as "resource hubs," to promote early childhood learning and child
development, support the needs of families and increase access to high-quality early
childhood education. The resource hubs must provide families with the information and
support necessary to locate early childhood programs. Each resource hub must be affiliated
with an existing regional nonprofit organization in order to facilitate partnerships and avoid
duplication of services.
2. Early Childhood Learning and Development Resource Hub Fund. The Early
Childhood Learning and Development Resource Hub Fund is established as a nonlapsing
fund within and administered by the department to support the development and
administration of resource hubs. The commissioner may accept funds from any public or
private source for the purposes described in this chapter.
3. Resource hubs. By November 1, 2025, the department shall establish 4 regional
resource hubs. In establishing and administering resource hubs under this section, the
department shall:
A. Prioritize the geographical locations of services provided pursuant to the First 4
ME Early Care and Education Program established in section 3931;
B. Seek input from the Children's Cabinet established in Title 5, section 19131, which
shall seek input from local communities to recommend the best regions for additional
resource hubs based on child demographics and geography; and
C. Ensure that each resource hub maintains an affiliation with a regional nonprofit
organization.
4. Duties of resource hubs. The resource hubs must assist in fostering coordination,
collaboration and planning related to early childhood programs and family support
programs in order to provide resources to parents, educators, employers and community
members. Each resource hub must:
A. Conduct a regional needs assessment to determine local supply and demand for
child care services, including annual surveys of parents and local employers to
determine the capacity of regional child care and local early childhood services
providers to supply services;
B. Create an annual plan based on the regional needs assessments under paragraph A
in collaboration with regional partners, including an annual work plan to meet the child
care needs of parents and employers in the region;
Page 1 - 132LR2207(01)

C. Assist parents in applying for the Maine Child Care Affordability Program
established in section 3731-A, Head Start programs and other early childhood
programs;
D. Connect parents to and raise awareness of other local and state resources, including
community action agencies, public preschools, the Help Maine Grow System under
section 3921 and the Child Development Services System under Title 20-A, section
7209, subsection 3 and other department programs;
E. Serve as a resource for public schools and the Child Development Services System
under Title 20-A, section 7209, subsection 3 to identify early childhood programs to
support the needs of young children with disabilities;
F. Work with employers and educators to meet local child care needs by supporting
the expansion or development of new programs;
G. Collaborate with programs designed to train individuals interested in opening or
expanding child care businesses to support new and existing child care providers with
facility expansion or upgrades and business or financial assistance;
H. Support the needs of educators to navigate state systems, including the Maine Child
Care Affordability Program established in section 3731-A and state child care
licensing;
I. Serve as a model for the development of a whole family approach to supporting the
needs of families with children. For the purposes of this paragraph, "whole family
approach" means a coordinated, strength-based approach to ensure that children and
their families can build a path to economic stability;
J. Provide parents training on child development and parenting skills;
K. Increase the capacity of child care providers to provide culturally responsive
services;
L. Collaborate with a professional development network of child care providers to
deliver regional professional development training;
M. Collaborate with higher education partners to increase interest in early childhood
education as a career opportunity for youth and adults;
N. Assist with innovative and collaborative partnerships among early childhood
services providers related to shared services or cooperative services models to create
efficiencies, build capacity, better support educators and staff and increase high-quality
programming;
O. Solicit local funding to support state funding of resource hubs at a 50% match rate;
P. Based on available funding, provide grants to support the needs of parents, educators
and employers to strengthen the accessibility of high-quality early childhood programs;
and
Q. Submit an annual report to the department that includes the following:
(1) The source and amount of funds received;
Page 2 - 132LR2207(01)

(2) The amounts distributed and the purpose of expenditures, including, but not
limited to, funds expended to assist early education and child care educators and
staff;
(3) Any grants provided to early education and child care programs, philanthropic
organizations or other stakeholder organizations;
(4) Anticipated revenue and expenditure projections for the next fiscal year;
(5) Information from the resource hub's regional needs assessment under
paragraph A and other information determined necessary by the department; and
(6) Recommendations from the resource hub and its partner board established
pursuant to subsection 6 regarding improvements to better align and coordinate
services for children and families.
5. Duties of department. The department shall:
A. Initiate a competitive request for proposals process and enter into agreements with
3rd-party entities to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
B. Establish by rule the process through which eligible entities may apply for program
funds, the criteria used to make award determinations and the allowable award uses;
C. Provide a 50% match rate for entities awarded grants to establish resource hubs;
D. Standardize data collection by resource hubs to ensure that the data can be easily
compiled for statewide assessment;
E. Collaborate with the Department of Education and the Children's Cabinet
established in Title 5, section 19131 to address recommendations on improving the
coordination and service delivery for children in the State and their families, based on
a whole family approach, as defined in subsection 4, paragraph I;
F. Engage with communities statewide to promote and build the capacity for additional
participation in the First 4 ME Early Care and Education Program established in section
3931; and
G. Perform other functions necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter,
including the monitoring of grantees.
6. Regional partner boards. A resource hub must establish a board of local
community partners to assist with oversight of the resource hub and to support the work of
the resource hub of bringing together local partners to improve the availability and quality
of early childhood services for children and families in their communities. Members must
include a broad representation of local partners, including parents, early childhood
educators, business leaders, school leadership, community action agency staff, early
intervention specialists, community college or university staff, regional health or medical
center staff and other child and family community advocates as determined by community
need.
7. Report. The department shall, beginning January 1, 2027 and annually thereafter,
submit a report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
health and human services matters and education and cultural affairs and to the members
of the Children's Cabinet established in Title 5, section 19131 and its advisory council
regarding the status of state and regional early childhood education and family needs, data
Page 3 - 132LR2207(01)

413 collected by resource hubs and any related recommendations to increase access to early
424 childhood services.
8. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of this
chapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this chapter are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. Resource hubs. By December 15, 2025, the Department of Health and
Human Services shall provide to the Joint Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services the department's plans for establishing resource hubs under the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 22, section 4100-D in addition to the 4 resource hubs required to be
established pursuant to Title 22, section 4100-D, subsection 3. By July 1, 2027, the
department shall establish additional resource hubs.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides allocations to establish one Social Service Program Specialist II
position, beginning October 1, 2025, to support development of early childhood learning
and development resource hubs.
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $89,587 $114,548
All Other $6,500 $6,500
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $96,087 $121,048
2159 Child Care Services 0563
Initiative: Provides funding for contracts for 4 early childhood learning and development
resource hubs, beginning April 1, 2026.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $187,500 $750,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $187,500 $750,000
3228
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $187,500 $750,000
__________ __________
FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND TOTAL $187,500 $750,000
3373
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $187,500 $750,000
Page 4 - 132LR2207(01)

FEDERAL BLOCK GRANT FUND $283,587 $871,048
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $471,087 $1,621,048